Arkansas, session 2025, SB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-202(c)(1), concerning public notice of
elections, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) On the day of any election, the following shall be posted at
each polling site and remain posted continuously therein until the polls
close:
(A) The public notice of election required in subsection
(a) of this section;
(B)(i) At least two (2) sample ballots, marked with the
word “SAMPLE”, of each ballot style that will be used at the polling site.
(ii) If the polling site has more than fifteen (15)
ballot styles and has posted a sample ballot for each ballot style via an
internet website before the beginning of early voting, the polling site may
*SSS136*
03-13-2025 10:06:31 SSS136

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 H3/13/25 SB293
provide the following in lieu of the sample ballots under subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(i) of this section:
(a) At least two (2) bound volumes that
include each sample ballot, marked with the word “SAMPLE”; or
(b) At least one (1) bound volume that
includes each sample ballot, marked with the word “SAMPLE”, and at least one
(1) electronic device that allows voters to access a sample ballot for each
ballot style;
(C)(i) Two (2) copies of the full text of all measures on
the ballot.
(ii) Copies posted under subdivision (c)(1)(C)(i) of
this section shall include a copy of the concise abstract prepared and
distributed under § 7-9-114;
(D) At least two (2) copies of instructions on how to
vote, including how to cast a provisional ballot and instructions for fail-
safe voting;
(E) General information on voting rights under applicable
federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual
to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the
appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated;
(F)(i) General information on federal and state laws
regarding prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation; and
(ii) Information about the availability of the
Attorney General's election law violation hotline Election Integrity Unit,
including without limitation the hotline telephone number of the Attorney
General's election law violation hotline established under § 7-4-305;
(G)(i) Double-sided signs containing the words “VOTE
HERE”.
(ii) Each sign shall be at least two feet by two feet
(2′ x 2′) in size and shall contain an arrow pointing to the polling site.
(iii) A sign shall be posted near each main driveway
entrance to the polling site on each public street bordering the polling site
so as to be visible to all traffic approaching the polling site.
(iv) The sign shall be as close as possible to the
public street without obstructing traffic; and
(H)(i) One (1) printout from each voting machine,
03-13-2025 10:06:31 SSS136

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 H3/13/25 SB293
terminal, or ballot tabulator showing that the candidate and question
counters register zero (0).
(ii) A poll worker shall produce one (1) printout
from each machine showing whether the candidate and question counters
register zero (0) and all poll workers present shall sign the printout.
(iii) A poll worker shall post the printout upon the
wall of the polling room where it shall remain throughout the election day;
(I) A copy of the poll watcher rights and
responsibilities;
(J) A notice stating that if any voter needs assistance,
the voter may ask a poll worker;
(K) A notice on electioneering, to be posted inside the
polling site; and
(L)(i) During preferential primary election and
nonjudicial elections, the following additional postings:
(a) A posting containing an example of the
primary ballot's selections; and
(b) A notice that:
(1) States "CROSSOVER VOTING IS A
CRIME";
(2) Explains crossover voting; and
(3) States the penalties for a violation
of crossover voting laws under § 7-1-103(a)(18)(B) and § 7-1-104(a)(10).

(ii) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall
provide a standard form for a sign under subdivision (c)(1)(L)(i)(b) of this
section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-312(n), concerning poll watchers,
candidates, or designees and rights and challenges of a voter's ballot, is
amended to read as follows:
(n) Poll watcher rights and responsibilities shall be posted in plain
view at each polling site, absentee ballot processing site, and counting
site.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-518(c), concerning voting machines
03-13-2025 10:06:31 SSS136

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 H3/13/25 SB293
being inactivated until the polls open, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The poll workers shall produce one (1) printout from each
machine showing whether the candidate and question counters register zero
(000) and shall sign and post the printout upon the wall of the polling room,
where it shall remain throughout the election day.
(2) After the close of voting on election day, the certified
printout, signed by the poll workers, shall be:
(A)(1) Returned to the county board of election
commissioners; and
(B)(2) Filed with the election returns.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-5-611(d)(2) and (3), concerning
preparation of electronic vote tabulating devices and disposition of voting
material, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The poll workers shall sign and post the printout upon the
wall of the polling room where it shall remain throughout the election day.
(3) The certified printout shall be filed with the election
returns.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-9-114(b), concerning the abstract of a
proposed measure, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Not less than eighteen (18) days before the election, the
Secretary of State shall transmit a certified copy of the abstract to the
county boards of election commissioners, who shall cause copies to be printed
and posted conspicuously at all polling places in the county for the
information of the voters.

/s/K. Hammer








03-13-2025 10:06:31 SSS136